Maine, session 132, LD2074.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §7001-A, sub-§7-A is enacted to read:
7-A. Licensed master social worker - conditional clinical. "Licensed master social
worker - conditional clinical" means a person who has met the educational requirements as
a licensed clinical social worker and is working to meet the consultation and the social
work experience requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §7001-A, sub-§8-A is enacted to read:
8-A. Licensed social worker - conditional. "Licensed social worker - conditional"
means a person who has met the educational requirements as a licensed social worker and
is working to meet the consultation and the social work experience requirements of this
chapter.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §7051, as amended by PL 1985, c. 736, §9, is further amended to
read:
§7051. License required
In order to safeguard the life, health and welfare of the people of this State, any person
practicing or offering to practice as a certified social worker - independent practice or
Page 1 - 132LR2816(03)

licensed clinical, licensed master or licensed social worker shall be social work under this
chapter is required to submit evidence to the board that he the person is qualified to so
practice and shall must be licensed as provided in this subchapter.
The board may grant a conditional license to any person eligible to take the
examination for licensure while waiting to sit for the examination or to any person who is
waiting to retake the examination according to rules issued by the board.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §7053, first ¶, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. V, §7, is
further amended to read:
To be eligible for a license to practice social work at any level, an applicant must be at
least 18 years of age and must satisfactorily pass any examination as the board may
prescribe by its rules. Each applicant, must demonstrate trustworthiness and competence to
engage in the practice of social work in such a manner as to safeguard the interests of the
public and must have demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board adherence to the ethics
of the social work profession. Applications for licensure must be submitted to the board
together with the fee as set under section 7056.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2013, c. 262, §3, is further
amended by repealing the 3rd blocked paragraph.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2013, c. 262, §3, is further
amended by enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
For purposes of meeting the requirements of this subsection, an applicant is not required to
be licensed as a licensed master social worker - conditional clinical under this chapter in
order to qualify as a licensed clinical social worker. The board shall consider consultation
and social work experience previously obtained in this State or another jurisdiction as long
as that experience is substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§2-A, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 211, §2, is amended
to read:
2-A. Licensed master social worker. As To be qualified as a licensed master social
worker, an applicant must have received either a masters master's or doctoral degree in
social work or social welfare from an accredited educational institution, must have
demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board adherence to the ethics of the social work
profession and must have successfully completed the examination prescribed by the board.
After meeting these qualifications, the applicant must receive a "licensed master social
worker" license. In addition, any person wishing to practice social work in a clinical setting
must receive a "licensed master social worker, conditional" license.
This subsection takes effect July 1, 2005.
Sec. 8. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Licensed master social worker - conditional clinical. To be qualified as a
licensed master social worker - conditional clinical, an applicant must have received either
a master's or doctoral degree in social work or social welfare from an accredited educational
institution, must have successfully completed the examination prescribed by the board and
must attest to obtaining the consultation and the social work experience requirements of
this chapter. The consultation arrangement must be with a licensed clinical social worker,
certified social worker - independent practice, licensed clinical professional counselor,
Page 2 - 132LR2816(03)

licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed psychologist, licensed psychiatrist or other
qualified consultant as determined by the board.
Sec. 9. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2009, c. 112, Pt. A, §13, is
further amended to read:
3. Requirements to be a licensed Licensed social worker. To be qualified to be
licensed as a licensed social worker, an applicant must attest to obtaining the consultation
and social work experience requirements of this chapter and meet one of the following
requirements:
A. The applicant must have received a bachelor's degree or higher in social work or
social welfare from an accredited educational institution; demonstrated to the
satisfaction of the board adherence to the ethics of the social worker profession; and
successfully completed the examination prescribed by the board; or
B. The applicant must have received a conditional license as a licensed social worker
in accordance with subsection 3‑B; completed the requirements for consultation and
social work experience while licensed as a licensed social worker - conditional under
this chapter, must have completed contact hours in accordance with subsection 3‑C,
paragraph B and subsection 3‑D; and must have successfully completed the
examination prescribed by the board. For purposes of meeting the requirements of this
subsection, an applicant is not required to be actively licensed as a licensed social
worker - conditional under this chapter in order to qualify as a licensed social worker.
Sec. 10. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§3-B, as amended by PL 2013, c. 217, Pt. J, §4, is
further amended to read:
3-B. Conditional license as a licensed Licensed social worker - conditional. The
board may issue a conditional license To be qualified as a licensed social worker to an
applicant who provides to the board - conditional, an applicant must provide:
A. Documented proof of a bachelor's degree or higher in a field that is sufficiently
related to social work or social welfare, as determined by the board; and attestation to
obtaining the consultation and social work experience requirements of this chapter. For
purposes of this paragraph, "field that is sufficiently related to social work or social
welfare" includes, but is not limited to, behavioral science, social and behavioral
sciences, childhood development, counseling, criminal justice, education, human
development, mental health and human services, nursing, psychology, educational
psychology, rehabilitation services, sociology and other sufficiently related fields as
determined by the board.
B. Any documentation as required by the board, which may include, but is not limited
to:
(1) Evidence of employment in a social service delivery field; and
(2) Evidence of an arrangement of consultation to be provided in accordance with
subsection 3‑C, paragraph B.
A licensed social worker - conditional license may be held for no more than 6 years.
Sec. 11. 32 MRSA §7053, sub-§3-C, as amended by PL 2005, c. 173, §1, is further
amended to read:
Page 3 - 132LR2816(03)

3-C. Consultation requirements for licensed social workers and conditionally
licensed social workers - conditional. A licensed social worker or conditionally licensed
social worker - conditional must complete the following requirements for consultation.
A. A licensed social worker and a licensed social worker - conditional must complete
a minimum of 96 hours of consultation as determined by the board. This consultation
must be concurrent with the first 3,200 hours of social work employment occurring in
a period of not less than 2 years but not more than 4 6 years from initial licensure. The
consultation arrangement must be with a consultant who is a licensed social worker
licensed under this chapter who has at least 2 years of work experience as a licensed
social worker. A licensed social worker - conditional is not eligible to be a consultant
under this chapter.
B. A person who receives a conditional license as a licensed social worker on or after
January 1, 2004 must complete the following requirements for consultation who
practiced social work and obtained social work consultation hours in a long-term care
setting and who held a valid license as of September 13, 2003 may count consultation
hours that were obtained prior to August 3, 2004, regardless of whether the consultation
hours were obtained in individual or group settings, if the consultation was provided
by a licensed social worker, regardless of the group size and the eligibility requirements
of the consulting licensed social worker.
(1) A person who is not an employee of the Department of Health and Human
Services must complete a minimum of 96 hours of consultation as determined by
the board. This consultation must be concurrent with the first 3,200 hours of social
work employment occurring in a period of not less than 2 years but not more than
4 years. For purposes of fulfilling the requirement of 96 hours of consultation
during the first 3,200 hours of social work employment, a licensed social worker
who practiced social work and obtained social work consultation hours in a long-
term care setting and who held a valid license as of September 13, 2003 may count
consultation hours that were obtained prior to August 3, 2004, whether the
consultation hours were obtained in individual or group settings, if the consultation
was provided by a licensed social worker, regardless of the group size and the
eligibility requirements of the consulting licensed social worker.
(2) A person who is an employee of the Department of Health and Human Services
must complete a minimum of 96 hours of consultation with a licensed social
worker who has been licensed for at least 4 years or a licensed master social
worker. This consultation must be concurrent with the first 3,200 hours of social
work employment occurring in a period of not less than 2 years but not more than
4 years.
Sec. 12. 32 MRSA §7053-A, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. V, §8, is
further amended to read:
4. Licensed social worker; licensed social worker - conditional. A licensed social
worker or a licensed social worker - conditional may:
A. Engage in psychosocial evaluation, excluding the diagnosis and treatment of mental
illness, and conduct basic data gathering of records and specific life issues of
individuals, groups and families, assess this data and formulate and implement a plan
to achieve specific goals related to specific life issues;
Page 4 - 132LR2816(03)

B. Serve as an advocate for clients or groups of clients for the purpose of achieving
specific goals relating to specific life issues;
C. Refer clients to other professional services;
D. Plan, manage, direct or coordinate social services; and
E. Participate in training and education of social work students from an accredited
institution or an educational institution in candidacy for accreditation with the Council
on Social Work Education or a successor or other organization approved by the board
and supervise other licensed social workers.
A licensed social worker or a licensed social worker - conditional may not engage in the
private practice of social work, diagnose mental illness and emotional disorders or provide
psychotherapy. A licensed social worker with less than 2 years' experience must receive
consultation from either a licensed master social worker, a licensed clinical social worker
or a certified social worker - independent practice in a manner to be prescribed by the board
on a group or individual basis 4 hours a month. Licensed social workers in health care
facilities licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services must receive
consultation on a quarterly basis in a manner prescribed by the department. The department
staff giving consultation to intermediate care facilities must be on the master or clinical
level by January 1, 1993.
State agencies employing social workers are responsible for providing supervision
necessary for those social workers to maintain their licenses.
Sec. 13. 32 MRSA §7060, as amended by PL 2013, c. 262, §4, is further amended
to read:
§7060. Expiration and renewals
A license renewal fee as set under section 7056 must be paid by the licensee. Licenses
expire biennially on December 31st or at such other times as the Commissioner of
Professional and Financial Regulation may designate. Each renewal is contingent upon
evidence of participation in a continuing professional education course or program as
approved by the board. A license may be renewed up to 90 days after the date of expiration
upon payment of a late fee in addition to the renewal fee as set under section 7056. Any
person who submits an application for renewal more than 90 days after the renewal date is
subject to all requirements governing new applicants under this chapter, except that the
board may in its discretion, giving due consideration to the protection of the public, waive
examination if the renewal application is received, together with the late fee and renewal
fee, within 2 years from the date of the expiration.
Beginning January 1, 2020, an applicant for license renewal shall demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the board a one-time successful completion of a minimum of 12 hours of
course work in family or intimate partner violence, including course work in spousal or
partner abuse that addresses screening, referral and intervention strategies, including
knowledge of community resources, cultural factors, evidence-based risk assessment and
same-gender abuse dynamics. An applicant may fulfill this requirement through course
work provided through contact hours, Internet hours or distance learning programs, as
evidenced by certification from an accredited educational institution or equivalent teaching
or practice experience. The board may accept equivalent courses in family or intimate
partner violence screening and referral and intervention strategies or equivalent teaching
Page 5 - 132LR2816(03)

or practice experience completed prior to January 1, 2020 in satisfaction of this
requirement. Continuing education courses taken pursuant to this paragraph may be used
to satisfy the licensee's required hours of continuing education.
A licensee who is no longer actively practicing social work may apply for an inactive
status license pursuant to Title 10, section 8003, subsection 5‑A, paragraph D,
subparagraph (5). The holder of an inactive status license may not practice social work in
the State. The fee for inactive status licensure is set under section 7056. The holder of an
inactive status license is required to renew the license annually and pay the renewal fee as
set under section 7056, but is not required to meet the continuing education requirement of
this chapter and the rules adopted under it.
In addition to the other requirements of this section, a licensed social worker must:
1. Not employee of Department of Health and Human Services. If not employed
by the Department of Health and Human Services, provide documentation of 96 hours of
consultation as determined by the board during the first 3,200 hours of social work
employment in a period of not less than 2 years but not more than 4 years. For purposes of
fulfilling the requirement of 96 hours of consultation during the first 3,200 hours of social
work employment, a licensed social worker who practiced social work and obtained social
work consultation hours in a long-term care setting and who held a valid license as of
September 13, 2003 may count consultation hours that were obtained prior to August 3,
2004, whether the consultation hours were obtained in individual or group settings, if the
consultation was provided by a licensed social worker, regardless of the group size and the
eligibility requirements of the consulting licensed social worker; or
2. Employee of Department of Health and Human Services. If employed by the
Department of Health and Human Services, provide documentation of either:
A. A minimum of 96 hours of consultation with a licensed social worker who has been
licensed for at least 4 years or a licensed master social worker. This consultation must
be concurrent with the first 3,200 hours of social work employment occurring in a
period of not less than 2 years but not more than 4 years; or
B. A minimum of 96 hours of consultation concurrent with the person's first 3,200
hours of social work employment occurring in a period of not less than 2 years but not
more than 4 years with a licensed social worker who has been licensed for at least 2
years, has been designated by the department as a supervisor trainee and is concurrently
receiving 48 hours of consultation with a licensed master social worker.
A person who submits an application for license renewal more than 2 years from the
date of expiration of the license is subject to all requirements governing new applicants
under this chapter, except that the board may in its discretion, giving due consideration to
the protection of the public, waive examination, consider consultation and work experience
obtained under this chapter and require evidence of completing continuing professional
education.
Sec. 14. Continued review of licensing for social work profession. The
Director of the Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation within the Department
of Professional and Financial Regulation, after consultation with the State Board of Social
Worker Licensure and stakeholders, shall continue review of the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 32, chapter 83 and any laws associated with the provisions of that chapter that began
Page 6 - 132LR2816(03)

before the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature to recommend changes to
update the licensure provisions for the social work profession, including changes to the
educational and examination requirements for initial licensure and to the consultation
requirements, and to recommend alternative pathways for licensure. The director shall
review and identify best practices from similar efforts in other states. The director shall
report any recommendations from the review conducted under this section to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health coverage, insurance
and financial services matters on or before February 15, 2027. The joint standing committee
may report out a bill to the 133rd Legislature in 2027 based on the review.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 7 - 132LR2816(03)